New Jersey, session 222, A2005.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 26 of P.L.1948, c.448 (C.13:1B-24) is amended to read as follows: There shall be within the Division of Fish[, Game] and Wildlife, a Fish and Game Council which shall consist of 11 members, each of whom shall be chosen with due regard to his knowledge of and interest in the conservation of fish and game.  Each member of the council shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate.  Three of [such] the members shall be farmers, recommended to the Governor for appointment to the council by the agricultural convention held pursuant to the provisions of article 2 of chapter 1 of Title 4 of the Revised Statutes;  [six of such members shall be sportsmen, recommended to  the Governor for appointment to the council by the New Jersey State Federation  of Sportsmen's Clubs;] three of [such] the members shall be sportsmen, recommended to the Governor for appointment to the council by the New Jersey State Federation of Sportsmens Clubs or its successor organization; three of [such] the members shall be individuals recommended to the Governor for appointment to the council by animal welfare organizations in this State; one of [such] the members shall be the chairman of the committee established pursuant to section 7 of the "Endangered and Nongame  Species Conservation Act" (P.L.1973, c. 309;  C. 23:2A-7)[,]; and one of such members shall be a person knowledgeable in land use management and soil conservation practices.  One of [such] the farmer representatives [and two], one of [such] the sportsmen representatives, and one of such animal welfare representatives in the council shall be chosen from among residents of any of the following counties--Bergen, Essex, Hudson, Morris, Passaic, Sussex and Warren; one of [such] the farmer representatives [and two], one of [such] the sportsmen representatives, and one of such animal welfare representatives in the council shall be chosen from among residents of any of the following counties--Hunterdon, Mercer, Middlesex, Monmouth, Ocean, Somerset and Union; and one of [such] the farmer representatives [and two], one of [such] the sportsmen representatives, and one of [such] the animal welfare representatives shall be chosen from among residents of any of the following counties--Atlantic, Burlington, Camden, Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester and Salem. For the purposes of this section, animal welfare organization means a notforprofit organization established to promote animal welfare, exempt from federal taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.501(c)(3)), and the primary purpose of which is the protection, care, humane treatment or advocacy of animals. Each member of the council shall be appointed for a term of [4] four years and shall serve until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. (cf: P.L.1979, c.199, s.72) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.